Utah statutes.
77-41-109.   Miscellaneous provisions.

(1) (a)  If an offender is to be temporarily sent on any assignment outside a secure facility in which the offender is confined on any assignment, including, without limitation, firefighting or disaster control, the official who has custody of the offender shall, within a reasonable time prior to removal from the secure facility, notify the local law enforcement agencies where the assignment is to be filled.

(b)  This Subsection (1) does not apply to any person temporarily released under guard from the institution in which the person is confined.

(2)  Notwithstanding Title 77, Chapter 40, Utah Expungement Act, a person convicted of any offense listed in Subsection 77-41-102(9) or (16) is not relieved from the responsibility to register as required under this section, unless the offender is removed from the registry under Section 77-41-112.

